Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 139, O.S.L.
2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 3251), is amended to read as
follows:

Req. No. 14293 Page 1

Section 3251. A. No institution of higher education within The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education shall utilize state funds,
property, or resources to:
1. Grant or support diversity, equity, and inclusion positions,
departments, activities, procedures, or programs to the extent they
grant preferential treatment based on one person's particular race,
color, ethnicity, or national origin over another's;
2. Mandate any person to participate in, listen to, or receive
any education, training, activities, procedures, or programming to
the extent such education, training, activities, procedures, or
programming grants preferences based on one person's particular
race, color, sex, ethnicity, or national origin over another's;
3. Mandate any person swear, certify, or agree to any loyalty
oath that favors or prefers one particular race, color, sex,
ethnicity, or national origin over another's;
4. Mandate any person to certify or declare agreement with,
recognition of, or adherence to any particular political,
philosophical, religious, or other ideological viewpoint;
5. Mandate any applicant for employment provide a diversity,
equity, and inclusion statement or give any applicant for employment
preferential consideration based on the provision of such a
diversity, equity, and inclusion statement; or
6. Mandate any person to disclose his or her pronouns.

Req. No. 14293 Page 2

B. 1. After the effective date of this act, institutions of
higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education shall initiate a review of diversity, equity, and
inclusion positions, departments, activities, procedures, and
programs and, if deemed necessary, restructure or eliminate
functions that are not necessary for compliance, accreditation, or
student or employee support services intended to broadly support
success.
2. An institution of higher education may provide to each
employee in good standing at the institution whose position is
eliminated as result of this section a letter of recommendation for
employment for a position at the institution or elsewhere.
C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or
prohibit institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education, including any agency of the executive
branch supporting those institutions' work, from applying for a
grant or complying with the accreditation requirements of an
accrediting or licensing agency including, but not limited to,
submitting to the grantor or accreditation agency a statement that:
1. Highlights the institution's or agency's work in supporting:
a. first-generation college students,
b. students from low-income families,
c. students with unique abilities, or
d. underserved student populations; or
Req. No. 14293 Page 3

2. Certifies compliance with applicable anti-discrimination
laws, rules, and regulations.
D. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
apply to institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education with respect to:
1. A policy, practice, procedure, program, class, or activity
required for compliance with state or federal laws, rules, or
regulations for obtaining or retaining institutional, academic, or
discipline-specific accreditation or licensure;
2. The academic freedom of any individual faculty member to
direct the instruction within his or her own course;
3. Scholarly research or creative work by an institution of
higher education's students, faculty, or other research personnel or
the dissemination of such research or work;
4. An activity of a student organization registered with or
recognized by an institution of higher education;
5. Guest speakers or performances on short-term engagements;
6. Academic support, tutoring, and career services and student
success centers, so long as the programming is designed and
implemented without regard to race, sex, color, national origin, or
ethnicity;
7. Data collection; or
8. Access programs for military, veterans, Pell Grant
recipients, first-generation college students, students from low-
Req. No. 14293 Page 4

inco me families, students with unique abilities, or underserved
student populations.
E. By July 1, 2026, and each July 1 thereafter, institutions of
higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education shall electronically submit to the Governor, the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives a certificate of compliance with the provisions of
this section.
F. In the interim between each regular session of the
Legislature, the governing board of each institution of higher
education, or the board's designee, shall testify before the
standing legislative committees with primary judication over higher
education at a public hearing of the committee regarding the
institution's compliance with this section.
G. The State Auditor and Inspector shall periodically conduct a
compliance audit of each institution of higher education to
determine whether the institution has utilized state funds,
property, or resources in violation of this section. The schedule
for audits must ensure that each institution is audited at least
once every four (4) years. If the State Auditor and Inspector
determines that an institution of higher education has utilized
state funds, property, or resources in violation of this section,
the institution shall:

Req. No. 14293 Page 5

1. Cure the violation not later than the one hundredth and
eighth (180) day after the date on which the determination was made;
and
2. If the institution fails to cure the violation during the
period provided by paragraph 1 of this section, be ineligible for
disbursement of state-appropriated funds from the State Regents of
Higher Education for the immediately following fiscal year.
H. Any student or employee of an institution of higher
education who is required to participate in any education, training,
activities, procedures, or programming in violation of paragraph 2
of subsection A may bring an action against the institution for
injunctive or declaratory relief.
I. The State Regents for Higher Education, in coordination with
the institutions of higher education, shall conduct a biennial study
to identify the impact of the implementation of this section on the
application rate, acceptance rate, matriculation rate, retention
rate, grade point average, and graduation rate of the student at
institutions of higher education. On or before December 1 of each
even-numbered year, the State Regents shall electronically submit to
the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives a report on the results of
the biennial study and any recommendations for legislative or other
action.

Req. No. 14293 Page 6

J. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the
promotion of civil discourse, debate, or speech that is protected by
the First Amendment to the United States Constitution.
G. K. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may
promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14293 AQH 12/11/25













Req. No. 14293 Page 7